Massachusetts, session 194th, H1223.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 17E of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as so
appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 11, after the
words “cancer or leukemia;” the following:-
or as a result of alopecia areata, alopecia totalis, non-classical 21-hydroxylase or
permanent loss of facial or scalp hair due to injury; provided, however, that the alopecia is not
part of the natural or premature aging process; and
SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, after section 47KK, the following section:-
of 5

Section 47LL. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:-
“Prosthesis”, an artificial appliance used to replace a lost natural structure; provided,
however, that prosthesis shall include, but not be limited to, artificial arms, legs, breasts, scalp
hair, facial pigmentation or glass eyes.
"Scalp hair prosthesis”, an artificial substitute for scalp hair.
"Facial medical pigmentation", an artificial substitute for facial hair, including, but not
limited to, eyebrows.
(b) An individual policy of accident and sickness insurance issued under section 108 that
provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and any group blanket or general
policy of accident and sickness insurance issued under section 110 that provides hospital expense
and surgical expense insurance, which is issued or renewed within or without the
commonwealth, shall provide benefits on a nondiscriminatory basis for any other prosthesis,
coverage for expenses for facial medical pigmentation or scalp hair prostheses worn for hair loss
suffered as a result of the treatment of any form of cancer or leukemia, or as a result of alopecia
areata, alopecia totalis, non-classical 21-hydroxylase or permanent loss of facial or scalp hair due
to injury; provided, however, that the alopecia is not part of the natural or premature aging
process; and provided, however, that such coverage shall be subject to a written statement by the
treating physician that the facial medical pigmentation or scalp hair prosthesis is medically
necessary; and provided, further, that such coverage shall be subject to the same limitations and
guidelines as other prostheses.
of 5

SECTION 3. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 8MM the following section:-
Section 8NN. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:-
“Prosthesis”, an artificial appliance used to replace a lost natural structure; provided,
however, that prosthesis shall include, but not be limited to, artificial arms, legs, breasts, scalp
hair, facial pigmentation or glass eyes.
“Scalp hair prosthesis”, an artificial substitute for scalp hair.
"Facial medical pigmentation", an artificial substitute for facial hair, including, but not
limited to, eyebrows.
A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group hospital
service plan that is issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide benefits
on a nondiscriminatory basis for expenses for facial medical pigmentation or scalp hair
prosthesis worn for hair loss suffered as a result of the treatment of any form of cancer or
leukemia, or as a result of alopecia areata, alopecia totalis, non-classical 21-hydroxylase or
permanent loss of scalp hair due to injury; provided, however, that the alopecia is not part of the
natural or premature aging process; and provided, however, that such coverage shall be subject to
a written statement by the treating physician that the facial medical pigmentation or scalp hair
prosthesis is medically necessary. Such coverage shall be subject to the same limitations and
guidelines as other prosthesis. Such pigmentation and prosthesis coverage shall be provided at a
minimum at the same amount and frequency as any state insurer provides for hair prostheses for
hair loss due to chemotherapy.
of 5

SECTION 4. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4MM the following section:-
Section 4NN. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:-
“Prosthesis”, an artificial appliance used to replace a lost natural structure; provided,
however, that prosthesis shall include, but not be limited to, artificial arms, legs, breasts, scalp
hair, facial pigmentation or glass eyes.
“Scalp hair prosthesis”, an artificial substitute for scalp hair.
"Facial medical pigmentation", an artificial substitute for facial hair, including, but not
limited to, eyebrows.
A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement that is
issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall provide benefits on a
nondiscriminatory basis for expenses for facial medical pigmentation or scalp hair prosthesis
worn for hair loss suffered as a result of the treatment of any form of cancer or leukemia, or as a
result of alopecia areata, alopecia totalis, non-classical 21-hydroxylase, or permanent loss of
facial or scalp hair due to injury; provided, however, that the alopecia is not part of the natural or
premature aging process. Such coverage, however, shall be subject to a written statement by the
treating physician that the medical pigmentation or hair prosthesis is medically necessary. Such
coverage shall be subject to the same limitations and guidelines as other prosthesis. Such medical
pigmentation or scalp hair prosthesis coverage shall be provided at a minimum at the same
amount and frequency as any state insurer provides for hair prostheses for hair loss due to
chemotherapy.
of 5

SECTION 5. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4EE the following section:-
Section 4FF. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:-
“Prosthesis”, an artificial appliance used to replace a lost natural structure; provided,
however, that prosthesis shall include, but not be limited to, artificial arms, legs, breasts, scalp
hair, facial pigmentation or glass eyes.
“Scalp hair prosthesis”, an artificial substitute for scalp hair.
"Facial medical pigmentation", an artificial substitute for facial hair, including, but not
limited to, eyebrows.
A health maintenance contract issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth
shall provide benefits on a nondiscriminatory basis for facial hair loss suffered as a result of the
treatment of any form of cancer or leukemia, or as a result of alopecia areata, alopecia totalis,
non-classical 21-hydroxylase or permanent loss of facial or scalp hair due to injury; provided,
however, that the alopecia is not part of the natural or premature aging process; and provided,
however, that such coverage shall be subject to a written statement by the treating physician that
the facial medical pigmentation or scalp hair prosthesis is medically necessary. Such coverage
shall be subject to the same limitations and guidelines as other prostheses. Such prosthesis
coverage shall be provided at a minimum at the same amount and frequency as any state insurer
provides for hair prostheses for hair loss due to chemotherapy.
of 5